Kentucky statutes. TITLE XX Alcoholic Beverages
Licenses to Traffic in Alcoholic Beverages
243.155.
Small farm winery license — Eligibility and application process — Business authorized by license — Direct shipment of wine — Custom crushing services — Off-premise retail sales outlet in wet territory — Other permitted licenses — Renewal of license — Sampling by employees.

Any in-state or out-of-state small farm winery may apply for a small farm winery license. In addition to all other licensing requirements, an applicant for a small farm winery license shall submit with its application a copy of the small farm winery’s federal basic permit and proof documenting its annual wine production. An out-of-state winery shall submit additional documentation evidencing its resident state. As part of the application process, an out-of-state winery shall publish its notice of intent, as required by KRS

243.360

, in the Kentucky newspaper of highest circulation. The board shall promulgate administrative regulations establishing the form the documentation of proof of production shall take.

A small farm winery license shall authorize the licensee to perform the following functions without having to obtain separate licenses, except that each small farm winery off-premises retail site shall be separately licensed:

Engage in the business of a winery under the terms and conditions of KRS

243.120

and

243.130

. The manufacture of wine at the small farm winery shall not be less than two hundred fifty (250) gallons, and shall not exceed five hundred thousand (500,000) gallons, in one (1) year;

Bottle wines produced by that small farm winery and other licensed small farm wineries;

Enter into an agreement with another licensed small farm winery under which it crushes, processes, ferments, bottles, or any combination of these services, the grapes, fruits, or other agricultural products of the other small farm winery for a production year. The resulting wine shall be considered the product of the small farm winery that provides the fruit. The small farm winery providing the custom crushing services may exclude the wine produced under this paragraph from its annual production gallonage;

If the licensed small farm winery or off-premises retail site premises is located in wet territory or in a precinct that has authorized alcoholic beverage sales by the small farm winery under KRS

242.124

:

Serve complimentary samples of wine produced by it in amounts not to exceed six (6) ounces per patron per day; and

Sell by the drink for on-premises consumption or off-premises consumption pursuant to KRS

243.081

, or by the package wine produced by it or by another licensed small farm winery, at retail to consumers;

Sell by the drink or by the package, at fairs, festivals, and other similar types of events, wine produced by it or by another licensed small farm winery, at retail to consumers if all sales occur in a wet territory;

Sell and transport wine produced by it to consumers, licensed small farm winery off-premises retail sites, wholesale license holders, and small farm winery license holders;

Consume on the premises wine produced by the small farm winery or a licensed small farm winery and purchased by the drink or by the package at the licensed premises, if the small farm winery is located in wet territory; and

A small farm winery may sell wine at retail to consumers in accordance with KRS

243.027

to

243.029

if it holds a direct shipper license.

If the requirements of KRS

242.1241

or 244.290(5) relating to Sunday sales on the licensed premises of a small farm winery are met, a small farm winery within that territory may sell alcoholic beverages on Sunday only in accordance with this section during the hours and times as permitted in the local ordinance for that locality.

A small farm winery license holder may also hold an NQ2 retail drink license or an NQ4 retail malt beverage drink license if:

The small farm winery is located in wet territory or in a precinct that has authorized alcoholic beverage sales by the small farm winery under KRS

242.124

; and

The issuance of these licenses is in connection with the establishment and operation of a restaurant, hotel, inn, bed and breakfast, conference center, or any similar business enterprise designed to promote viticulture, enology, and tourism.

This section shall not exempt the holder of a small farm winery license from the provisions of KRS Chapters 241 to 244, nor from the administrative regulations of the board, nor from regulation by the board at all premises licensed by the small farm winery, except as expressly stated in this section.

Nothing contained in this section shall exempt a licensed out-of-state winery from obeying the laws of its resident state.

Upon the approval of the department, a small farm winery license may be renewed after the licensee submits to the department the winery’s federal basic permit and proof of its annual wine production.

An employee of a small farm winery may sample the products produced by that small farm winery for purposes of education, quality control, and product development.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 381, § 2; 1982, ch. 244, § 2, effective July 15, 1982; 1988, ch. 433, § 2, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 54, § 5, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 451, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 148, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 357, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 167, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 142, § 1, effective June 20, 2005; 2006, ch. 179, § 1, effective January 1, 2007; 2010, ch. 24, § 569, effective July 15, 2010; 2013, ch. 121, § 62, effective June 25, 2013; 2014, ch. 115, § 3, effective July 15, 2014; 2016 ch. 80, § 15, effective July 15, 2016; 2017 ch. 62, § 54, effective June 29, 2017; 2018 ch. 164, § 4, effective April 13, 2018; 2020 ch. 80, § 19, effective July 15, 2020; 2020 ch. 102, § 10, effective July 15, 2020; 2021 ch. 20, § 4, effective March 15, 2021.

243.156.
Business authorized by farm winery license — Off-premise retail sales outlet in wet territory — Use of Kentucky products — Other permitted licenses. [Repealed.]

243.157.
Business authorized by a microbrewery license — Functions licensee permitted to perform — Microbrewery to pay wholesale and excise taxes on sales of malt beverages — Sampling by employees.

A microbrewery license shall authorize the licensee to perform the following functions:

Engage in the business of a brewer under the terms and conditions of KRS

243.150

, provided that production of malt beverages at the microbrewery shall not exceed fifty thousand (50,000) barrels in one (1) year;

Serve on the premises complimentary samples of malt beverages produced by the microbrewery in amounts not to exceed sixteen (16) ounces per patron, provided the microbrewery is located in wet territory or a precinct that has authorized the sale of alcoholic beverages at microbreweries under KRS

242.1239

;

Sell malt beverages produced on the premises of the microbrewery to licensed distributors;

Sell malt beverages produced on the premises of the microbrewery for on- and off-premises purposes in accordance with subsection (3)(b) and (c) of this section, pursuant to the following:

Without restriction on the amount of malt beverages sold by the drink for on-premises consumption provided the microbrewery is located in wet territory or a precinct that has authorized the sale of alcoholic beverages at microbreweries under KRS

242.1239

; and

With a restriction on the amount of malt beverages sold for off-premises consumption, in an aggregate amount not to exceed thirty-one (31) gallons per person per day that shall not include more than three (3) cases in case format;

Sell:

Unlimited amounts of malt beverages by the drink; and

Not more than one (1) case of packaged malt beverages;

produced on the premises of the microbrewery to consumers at fairs, festivals, and other similar types of events located in wet territory, in accordance with subsection (3)(b)2. and (c)2. of this section; and

Sell and deliver up to two thousand five hundred (2,500) barrels of malt beverages annually to any retail license holder, provided that:

Any products sold and delivered under this paragraph that are not otherwise registered by a licensed distributor shall be registered with the department by the microbrewery; and

The microbrewer notifies the distributor of any self-distribution delivery by electronic or other means.

A microbrewery license shall not be deemed to be incompatible with any other license except for a distributor’s license under the provisions of KRS

243.180

.

In accordance with the provisions of this section, a microbrewery license holder may:

Hold retail drink and package licenses both on and off the premises of the microbrewery. The holder of a microbrewery license is exempt from the provisions of KRS

244.570

and

244.590

as applied to any retail licenses held by the microbrewery license holder, and from any other sections which would restrict the co-ownership of the microbrewery license and any retail licenses described in this section;

Sell malt beverages produced on the premises of the microbrewery for on-premises purposes without having to transfer physical possession of those malt beverages to a licensed distributor provided:

The microbrewery possesses a retail drink license for those premises; and

The microbrewery reports and pays all taxes required by subsection (5)(a) and (b) of this section to the Department of Revenue at the time and in the manner required by the Department of Revenue in accordance with its powers under KRS 131.130(3); and

Sell malt beverages produced on the premises of the microbrewery for off-premises purposes without having to transfer physical possession of those malt beverages to a licensed distributor provided that:

The microbrewery possesses a retail package license for those premises; and

The microbrewery reports and pays all taxes required by subsection (5)(a) and (b) of this section to the Department of Revenue at the time and in the manner required by the Department of Revenue in accordance with its powers under KRS 131.130(3).

The provisions of subsection (3)(b) and (c) of this section shall apply only to malt beverages that are produced by the microbrewery at its licensed premises and:

Offered for sale by the microbrewery at that same premises under the microbrewery’s retail drink or package license; or

Offered for sale by the microbrewery at a fair, festival, or other similar type of event as authorized under subsection (1)(e) of this section.

All other malt beverages produced by the microbrewery which are offered for retail sale shall be sold and physically transferred to a licensed distributor in compliance with all other relevant provisions of KRS Chapters 241 to 244, and a licensed microbrewery shall not otherwise affect sales of malt beverages directly to retail customers except as provided in subsection (3)(b) and (c) of this section under KRS

243.027

to

243.029

if the microbrewery holds a direct shipper license.

A microbrewery selling malt beverages in accordance with subsection (1)(f) or (3)(b) and (c) of this section shall pay all wholesale sales taxes due under KRS

243.884

. For the purposes of this subsection, “wholesale sales” means a sale of malt beverages made by a microbrewery under subsection (1)(f) or (3)(b) and (c) of this section, as applicable.

A microbrewery shall pay the excise tax on malt beverages in accordance with KRS 243.720(3) and

243.730

and shall be entitled to the credit set forth in KRS 243.720(3)(b).

A microbrewery shall not be located in dry territory.

An employee of a microbrewery may sample the products produced by that microbrewery for purposes of education, quality control, and product development.

This section does not exempt the holder of a microbrewery license from the provisions of KRS Chapters 241 to 244, nor from any rules of the board as established by administrative regulations, nor from regulation by the board, except as expressly stated in this section. The provisions of this section shall not be deemed inconsistent with the provisions of KRS

244.602

.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to vitiate the policy of this Commonwealth, as set forth in KRS

244.167

and

244.602

, supporting an orderly three (3) tier system for the production and sale of malt beverages.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 60, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 1992, ch. 25, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 2013, ch. 121, § 104, effective June 25, 2013; 2016 ch. 80, § 16, effective July 15, 2016; 2017 ch. 62, § 55, effective June 29, 2017; 2018 ch. 16, § 1, effective July 14, 2018; 2020 ch. 80, § 20, effective July 15, 2020; 2020 ch. 102, § 9, effective July 15, 2020; 2021 ch. 34, § 1, effective June 29, 2021.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/15/2020). Although
2020 Ky. Acts ch. 102, sec. 9 contained citations to “Section 4 of this Act” (codified as
KRS

243.100

) in subsection (1)(b) and (d)l. of this statute, it is clear from the context that Section 8 (codified as
KRS

242.1239

) was intended, and the Reviser of Statutes has corrected this manifest clerical or typographical error in codification under the authority of
KRS

7.136

.

243.160.
Business authorized by wholesaler’s license.

A licensed wholesaler may purchase, receive, store, or possess distilled spirits and wine to sell at wholesale, from the licensed premises only, and to transport to and from the licensed premise only alcoholic beverages that the wholesaler’s license authorizes the licensee to sell. The wholesaler may transport:

Beverages in the manner provided for manufacturers in KRS

243.120

; and

Distilled spirits and wine from a manufacturer’s warehouse or from another licensed wholesaler’s premises to the licensed wholesaler premises.

The holder of a wholesaler’s license may sell and transport its products to the holder of a special nonbeverage alcohol license.

HISTORY:

2554b-120: amend. Acts 1942, ch. 168, §§ 2, 11; 1952, ch. 80, §
1, effective June 19, 1952; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013, ch. 121, § 63, effective June 25, 2013; 2017 ch. 62, § 56, effective June 29, 2017.

243.170.
Transactions permitted to wholesalers.

A wholesaler may sell, deliver, and transport distilled spirits and wine at wholesale, and from the licensed premises only, to:

Other wholesalers;

Retailers; or

A point out of the state to persons authorized by the law of the state of their residence, and by the United States government if located in the United States, to receive the distilled spirits and wine.

A wholesaler may purchase distilled spirits and wine at wholesale from licensed distillers, rectifiers, wineries, or other wholesalers and from nonresidents authorized by the law of the states of their residence, and by the United States government if located in the United States, to make the sales. A wholesaler may not transport distilled spirits and wine from any point to its own licensed premises, except as provided in KRS

243.200

.

No wholesaler shall sell or contract to sell, give away, or deliver any distilled spirits or wine to any person in Kentucky who is not licensed to receive, possess, distribute, or sell distilled spirits and wine, and no wholesaler shall sell or contract to sell, give away, or deliver any distilled spirits or wine to any consumer. This section does not permit sales or deliveries of distilled spirits in Kentucky by licensed wholesalers to nonresidents who are not licensed by their own states.

A wholesaler may extend credit on distilled spirits and wine sold to retail licensees for a period not to exceed thirty (30) days from the date of invoice, with the date of invoice included in the total number of days. When the thirty (30) day period has passed without payment in full, no wholesaler shall sell to the licensee except for cash on delivery.

HISTORY:

2554b-121: amend. Acts 1972, ch. 334, § 1; 2004, ch. 123, § 1, effective July 13, 2004; 2013, ch. 121, § 64, effective June 25, 2013; 2014, ch. 22, § 13, effective July 15, 2014; 2017 ch. 62, § 57, effective June 29, 2017.

243.180.
Business authorized by distributor’s license.

A distributor’s license shall authorize the licensee to:

Purchase malt beverages from Kentucky breweries or from out-of-state breweries or distributors licensed to do business by the state in which they are located;

Import a non-United States brand malt beverage from an importer or wholesaler registered with the Kentucky Department of Revenue;

Sell his or her products to the holder of a special nonbeverage alcohol license; or

Store malt beverages and to sell them only, from the licensed premises, to other distributors, to licensed retailers, to any of its employees for home consumption, and to charitable or fraternal organizations holding group meetings, picnics, or outings.

A distributor shall transport malt beverages only by a vehicle owned, rented, or leased and operated by the distributor, which has affixed to its sides at all times a sign of form and size prescribed by the state board, containing among other things the name and license number of the licensee. No distilled spirits or wine shall be transported on the same truck or vehicle with malt beverages, except by a common carrier, unless the owner of such truck or vehicle holds a wholesaler’s license.

A distributor’s license must be obtained for each separate warehouse, agent, distributor, broker, jobber, or place of business from which orders are received or beverages are distributed unless it is a licensed brewery.

History.

2554b-199: amend. Acts 1954, ch. 178; 1960, ch. 205, § 2; 1962, ch. 165; 1978, ch. 194, § 13, effective June 17, 1978; 1986, ch. 14, § 2, effective July 15, 1986; 2005, ch. 85, § 647, effective June 20, 2005; 2013, ch. 121, § 65, effective June 25, 2013.

243.190.
Certain distributors may repackage malt beverages. [Repealed.]

243.200.
Transporter’s license, authority for issuance to certain motor carriers or to common carrier — Holder’s privileges, duties, and restrictions — Delivery or shipment of alcoholic beverages with adult-signature-only service — Authority to examine vehicle and cargo — When transporter’s license not required — Conveyances to be made in properly marked vehicle — Required maintenance of books and records.

A transporter’s license may be issued as a primary license to a motor carrier authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth by the Transportation Cabinet or the Federal Motor Carrier Safety Administration or to another person engaged in business as a common carrier. A person holding a transporter’s license may transport alcoholic beverages to or from the licensed premises of any licensee under this chapter to an individual consumer if both the consignor and consignee in each case are authorized by the law of the states of their residence to sell, purchase, deliver, ship, or receive the alcoholic beverages.

A transporter may deliver or ship to consumers over twenty-one (21) years of age in packages clearly marked “Alcoholic Beverages, adult signature (21 years of age or over) required,” and shall request adult-signature-only service from the carrier. Deliveries or shipments of alcoholic beverages shall only be made into areas of the state in which alcoholic beverages may be lawfully sold. When the shipper requests adult-signature-only service, it shall be a violation for a common carrier not to inspect government-issued identification for proof of age. No properly licensed common carrier or any o(its employees acting on behalf of a consignor in the course and scope of a delivery or shipment of alcoholic beverages to a consumer shall be liable for a violation of this subsection or any provision of KRS

242.250

,

242.260

, or

242.270

prohibiting the delivery or shipment of alcoholic beverages into areas of the state in which alcoholic beverages are not lawfully sold.

Except for a common carrier that has been assigned a USDOT number issued by the Federal Motor Carrier Safety Administration, the holder of a transporter’s license shall cause each truck or vehicle to display the name of the licensee and the state license numbers in a manner prescribed by an administrative regulation promulgated by the board.

Except for an application by a common carrier that has been assigned a USDOT number issued by the Federal Motor Carrier Safety Administration, an application for a transporter’s license shall include a statement that the applicant, if issued a license, shall allow any authorized investigators of the department to stop and examine the cargo of any truck or vehicle in which alcoholic beverages are being transported within the boundaries of the Commonwealth of Kentucky.

A licensee may move, within the same county, alcoholic beverages from one (1) of the licensee’s licensed premises to another without a transporter’s license. A licensee may move alcoholic beverages from one (1) of the licensee’s licensed premises located in one (1) county to a licensed premises located in another county, without a transporter’s license, with prior written approval of the administrator for good cause shown. The licensee shall keep and maintain, in one (1) of its licensed premises, adequate books and records of the transactions involved in transporting alcoholic beverages from one (1) licensed premises to another in accordance with standards established in administrative regulations promulgated by the board. The records shall be available to the department and the Department of Revenue upon request.

Distilled spirits and wine may be transported by any licensed retailer selling distilled spirits or wine, by the package or by the drink, from the premises of a licensed wholesaler to the licensed premises of the retail licensee. Any retailer transporting alcoholic beverages under this subsection shall do so in a vehicle marked in conformity with administrative regulations of the board. Both the wholesaler and the retailer engaging in activity under this subsection shall be responsible for maintaining records documenting the transactions.

History.

Repealed and reenacted by 2017 ch. 62, § 58, effective January 1, 2018; 2554b-124, 2554b-154, 2554b-190: amend. Acts 1966, ch. 255, § 214; 1998, ch. 295, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2003, ch. 37, § 1, effective June 24, 2003; 2005, ch. 85, § 647, effective June 20, 2005; 2010, ch. 24, § 570, effective July 15, 2010; 2013, ch. 121, § 66, effective June 25, 2013; 2014, ch. 22, § 14, effective July 15, 2014; 2017 ch. 62, § 58, effective June 29, 2017; 2018 ch. 164, § 5, effective April 13, 2018; 2020 ch. 80, § 10, effective July 15, 2020; 2020 ch. 102, § 6, effective July 15, 2020.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/15/2020). This statute was amended by 2020 Ky. Acts chs. 80 and 102, which do not appear to be in conflict and have been codified together.

(6/29/2017). This statute was repealed and reenacted by 2017 Ky. Acts ch. 62, sec. 58 and amended by 2017 Ky. Acts ch. 177, sec. 6. Pursuant to KRS

446.260

, the repeal and reenactment in 2017 Ky. Acts ch. 62, sec. 58 prevails.

(7/15/2014). As amended by
2014 Ky. Acts ch. 22, sec. 14, subsection (9)(b) of this statute contains an erroneous reference to “residence requirements” of
KRS

244.090

. Although certain licensees were previously prohibited from employing any person who “has not had an actual bona fide residence in this Commonwealth for at least one (1) year” or “is not a citizen of the United States,” the General Assembly removed the state residency requirement from that statute in 1978 Ky. Acts ch. 194, sec. 19, and the national citizenship requirement in
1998 Ky. Acts ch. 522, sec. 20. The reference to
KRS

243.100

is correct.

243.205.
Business authorized by transporter’s license — Transportation of distilled spirits, wine, and malt beverages — Entities eligible for license — Reports to Department of Revenue — Restrictions upon routes traveled — Examination of cargo — Illegal trafficking — Exemption from KRS 243.100 and 244.090. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes

This section (Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 121, § 36, effective June 25, 2013) was repealed by Acts 2014, ch. 11, § 26, effective July 15, 2014.

243.210.
Business authorized by malt beverage transporter’s license. [Repealed.]

243.212.
Distilled spirits and wine supplier’s license authorizing importation of distilled spirits and wine — Nonresident entities eligible for license — Licenses and limited licenses — Exemption from notice requirements of KRS 243.360.

An out-of-state distiller, wholesaler, rectifier, winery, small farm winery, importer for a distillery, winery, or small farm winery, or importer of a non-United States brand of distilled spirits or wine, who is the primary source of supply, may obtain a distilled spirits and wine supplier’s license for importing distilled spirits and wine into Kentucky if it is:

Licensed to do business in the state in which it is located; and

Registered with the Kentucky Department of Revenue.

An entity listed in subsection (1) of this section who wishes to import more than fifty thousand (50,000) gallons of distilled spirits or wine shall:

Apply for an out-of-state distilled spirits and wine supplier’s license on an application provided by the department;

Submit documentation required by the application; and

Pay the annual fee required by KRS

243.030

.

An entity listed in subsection (1) of this section who wishes to import less than fifty thousand (50,000) gallons of distilled spirits or wine shall:

Apply for a limited out-of-state distilled spirits and wine supplier’s license on an application provided by the department;

Submit documentation required by the application; and

Pay the annual fee required by KRS

243.030

.

An out-of-state applicant shall be exempt from the notice requirements of KRS

243.360

.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 121, § 35, effective June 25, 2013; 2017 ch. 62, § 59, effective June 29, 2017.

243.215.
Malt beverage supplier’s license authorizing importation of malt beverages — Nonresident entities eligible for license — Licenses and limited licenses — Exemption from notice requirements of KRS 243.360.

An out-of-state brewer, distributor, importer for a brewer, or importer of a non-United States brand of malt beverage, who is the primary source of supply, may obtain a malt beverage supplier’s license for importing a malt beverage product into Kentucky if it is:

Licensed to do business in the state in which it is located; and

Registered with the Kentucky Department of Revenue.

An entity listed in subsection (1) of this section who wishes to import more than twenty-five thousand (25,000) barrels or seven hundred seventy-five thousand (775,000) gallons of malt beverage shall:

Apply for an out-of-state malt beverage supplier’s license on an application provided by the department;

Submit documentation required by the application; and

Pay the annual fee required by KRS

243.040

.

An entity listed in subsection (1) of this section who wishes to import less than twenty-five thousand (25,000) barrels or seven hundred seventy-five thousand (775,000) gallons of malt beverage shall:

Apply for a limited out-of-state malt beverage supplier’s license on an application provided by the department;

Submit documentation required by the application; and

Pay an annual fee required by KRS

243.040

.

An out-of-state applicant shall be exempt from the notice requirements of KRS

243.360

.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 121, § 34, effective June 25, 2013; 2017 ch. 62, § 60, effective June 29, 2017.

243.217.
Business authorized by air transporter’s license — Commercial airline system, charter flight system, or commercial cargo system eligible for license upon payment of fee — Annual renewal.

The department may issue an air transporter’s license to a commercial airline system, a charter flight system, or a commercial cargo system, upon the payment of the required fee. This license may be renewed annually. The license shall authorize the licensee to transport distilled spirits, wine, and malt beverages, into and out of Kentucky, upon regularly scheduled or charter flights of the licensee. The license shall authorize, for the purpose of transportation, the storage of distilled spirits, wine, and malt beverages at a location or locations, if operating from more than one (1) airport in Kentucky, as designated on the license application. This license shall authorize an airline to transport if both the consignor and consignee in each case are authorized by the laws of the states of their residence to sell, purchase, ship, or receive the distilled spirits, wine, and malt beverages.

History.

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 121, § 39, effective June 25, 2013.

243.220.
Premises that may not be licensed for sales at retail — Exemption.

No license shall be issued for any premises unless the applicant for the license is the owner of the premises or is in possession of the premises under a written agreement or a permit for a term of not less than the license period. A direct shipper license applicant shall be exempt from the requirements of this section, and shall instead follow the requirements as set forth in KRS

243.027

.

History.

2554b-174, 2554b-175, 2554b-177: amend. Acts 1944, ch. 154, § 13; 1974, ch. 10, § 1; 1978, ch. 194, § 15, effective June 17, 1978; 1998, ch. 121, § 13, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 289, § 5, effective July 14, 2000; 2012, ch. 125, § 4, effective July 12, 2012; 2017 ch. 62, § 61, effective June 29, 2017; 2021 ch. 13, § 7, effective March 12, 2021.

243.230.
Premises for which retail package, drink, and malt beverage licenses may be issued.

Except as limited by subsection (2) of this section, quota retail drink licenses may be issued for premises located within urban-county governments, incorporated cities, or elsewhere in counties if those cities and counties maintain an adequate police force.

Quota retail drink licenses may not be issued to premises located within a city or a county that has enacted an ordinance preventing the issuance of these licenses within the jurisdiction of the local government.

Quota retail package licenses may be issued only for premises located within:

Incorporated cities; or

Elsewhere in counties containing an urban-county government or a city with a population equal to or greater than eight thousand (8,000) if those counties maintain an adequate police force.

If one (1) or more quota retail package licenses have been issued to establishments in a county that does not contain a city meeting the population requirements of paragraph (a) of this subsection prior to January 1, 2015, then that county shall continue to be treated in a manner as if the county meets the qualifications of paragraph (a) of this subsection.

Notwithstanding subsection (3) of this section, the department may, after a field investigation, issue a quota retail package license to premises not located within any city if the county maintains an adequate police force under KRS

70.540

and

70.150

to

70.170

, and if:

Substantial aggregations of population would otherwise not have reasonable access to a licensed vendor;

The premises to be licensed under this subsection shall be used exclusively for the sale of distilled spirits and wine by the package and malt beverages, where applicable, and shall not be used in any manner, in connection with a dance hall, roadhouse, restaurant, store, or any other commercial enterprise, except as a drug store in which a registered pharmacist is employed.

No quota retail package license or quota retail drink license for the sale of distilled spirits or wine shall be issued for any premises used as or in connection with the operation of any business in which a substantial part of the commercial transaction consists of selling at retail staple groceries or gasoline and lubricating oil.

HISTORY:

2554b-129, 2554b-154: amend. Acts 1944, ch. 154, § 33; 2017 ch. 62, § 62, effective June 29, 2017.

243.232.
Sale and resale of vintage distilled spirits — Notice of purchase.

A person holding a license to sell distilled spirits by the drink or by the package at retail may sell vintage distilled spirits purchased from a nonlicensed person upon written notice to the department in accordance with administrative regulations promulgated by the department.

Vintage distilled spirits may be resold only:

By the drink by a person holding a license to sell distilled spirits by the drink; and

By the package by a person holding a license to sell distilled spirits by the package.

Vintage distilled spirits may be sold or resold by the package by a person holding a limited nonquota package license.

A vintage distilled spirits seller shall sell no more than twenty-four (24) vintage distilled spirits packages in any given twelve (12) month period.

Prior to selling vintage distilled spirits purchased from a vintage distilled spirits seller to a consumer, a licensee shall provide notice of its purchase of the spirits to the department. The notice shall contain the following information:

The name, address, state license number, and phone number of the licensee purchasing vintage distilled spirits;

The name, address, and phone number of the vintage distilled spirits seller;

The brand name and quantity of each vintage distilled spirits package purchased;

The date of the purchase; and

The number of packages that the licensee has previously purchased from the same vintage distilled spirits seller and the dates of those purchases.

HISTORY:

2017 ch. 59, § 2, effective January 1, 2018; 2022 ch. 39, § 8, effective March 29, 2022.

243.238.
Limited nonquota package license.

A limited nonquota package license may be issued as a supplementary license to a licensee that holds an NQ1 retail drink license, an NQ2 retail drink license, or a limited restaurant license in a jurisdiction that has authorized the sale of distilled spirits and wine by the package.

The limited nonquota package license shall authorize the licensee to:

Purchase private selection packages in the original manufacturer’s unopened containers; and

Sell private selection packages at retail in the original manufacturer’s unopened containers, and only for consumption off the licensed premises.

The licensee shall purchase private selection packages in accordance with KRS 243.0305(4).

HISTORY:

2022 ch. 39, § 2, effective March 29, 2022.

243.240.
Business authorized by quota retail package license — Delivery of alcoholic beverages purchased on premises by consumers.

A quota retail package license shall authorize the licensee to:

Purchase, receive, possess, and sell distilled spirits and wine at retail in unbroken packages only, and only for consumption off the licensed premises;

Deliver to the consumer, at the consumer’s request, alcoholic beverages that are purchased from the licensed premises, in quantities not to exceed four and one-half (4 1/2) liters of distilled spirits and four (4) cases of wine per consumer per day for sales prior to January 1, 2021, and in quantities not to exceed an aggregate of nine (9) liters of distilled spirits and four (4) cases of wine per consumer per day on and after January 1, 2021; and

Sell distilled spirits and wine in unbroken packages only at fairs and festivals held in wet territory if the fair or festival is located in the same county as the quota retail package license holder’s licensed premises; and

Notwithstanding KRS

243.0307

, sell and provide samples of distilled spirits and wine at fairs and festivals held in wet territory if the fair or festival is located in the same county as the quota retail package license holder’s licensed premises.

The licensee shall purchase distilled spirits and wine in retail packages only and only from:

Licensed wholesalers;

Those licensees authorized to sell distilled spirits and wine by the package at retail, but only if the distilled spirits and wine have first gone through the three (3) tier system; or

From a distillery souvenir gift shop.

The restrictions and permissions for sales to quota retail package licensees and to consumers that are authorized under KRS 243.0305(4) shall supersede any conflicting provisions of this section.

History.

2554b-122; 2013, ch. 121, § 68, effective June 25, 2013; 2017 ch. 62, § 63, effective June 29, 2017; 2018 ch. 164, § 6, effective April 13, 2018; 2020 ch. 80, § 11, effective July 15, 2020; 2021 ch. 13, § 20, effective March 12, 2021; 2022 ch. 39, § 9, effective March 29, 2022.

243.241.
Quota retail package licensee assumes business risk of subsequent increase of quota licenses in territory.

A quota retail package licensee assumes the business risk that the number of quota licenses available in a city or county may be increased at a later time.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 154, § 7, effective April 14, 2018.

243.250.
Business authorized by quota retail drink license.

A quota retail drink license shall authorize the licensee to purchase, receive, possess, and sell distilled spirits and wine at retail by the drink for consumption on the licensed premises, or off-premises consumption pursuant to KRS

243.081

. The licensee shall purchase distilled spirits and wine only from licensed wholesalers.

History.

2554b-123: amend. Acts 1970, ch. 136, § 1; 1978, ch. 194, § 16, effective June 17, 1978; 1998, ch. 522, § 8, effective July 15, 1998; 2012, ch. 125, § 6, effective July 12, 2012; 2013, ch. 121, § 69, effective June 25, 2013; 2014, ch. 22, § 16, effective July 15, 2014; 2017 ch. 62, § 64, effective June 29, 2017; 2021 ch. 20, § 5, effective March 15, 2021.

243.260.
Special temporary license for qualifying event — Activities permitted and prohibited.

A special temporary license may be issued in wet territory to any regularly organized fair, exposition, racing association, farmers market, or other party, when in the opinion of the board a necessity for the license exists. Unless inconsistent with this section, a special temporary licensee shall have the same privileges and restrictions of a quota retail drink licensee and an NQ4 retail malt beverage drink licensee at the designated premises, not to exceed thirty (30) days.

A nonprofit organization holding an NQ4 retail malt beverage drink license may be issued a special temporary license to sell distilled spirits and wine by the drink on the licensed premises for a specified and limited time, not to exceed ten (10) days. The temporary license may be issued in conjunction with any public or private event, including but not limited to weddings, receptions, reunions, or similar occasions.

The holder of a special temporary license may sell, serve, and deliver alcoholic beverages by the drink, for consumption only at the designated premises and the date and times for the qualifying event.

A special temporary license shall not be issued for an event held in dry or moist territory.

HISTORY:

2554b-127: amend. Acts 1990, ch. 54, § 6, effective July 13, 1990; 2017 ch. 62, § 65, effective June 29, 2017; 2022 ch. 39, § 10, effective March 29, 2022.

243.262.
Licensed horse race track may be issued temporary alcoholic beverage license.

Any person in wet territory licensed by the Kentucky Racing Commission under KRS

230.300

may be issued a license by the department and may hold a special temporary license as provided in KRS

243.260

. When issued, the license shall be valid and effective only upon premises licensed by the racing commission and upon the dates and hours for which racing or intertrack wagering has been authorized by the racing commission. A temporary license may be issued for the period the racing or intertrack wagering has been authorized, even if the period exceeds thirty (30) days as provided in KRS

243.260

.

History.

Repealed and reenact., Acts 2013, ch. 121, §
100, effective June 25, 2013.